North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 7. Organization.
In the eighteenth-E superior court district, Joseph John’s term expired December 31, 1986, but he is holding over because of a court order enjoining an election from being held in 1986. A successor shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the nineteenth-A superior court district, James C. Davis serves a term expiring December 31, 1992.

In the nineteenth-B1 superior court district, Russell G. Walker, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990. No election shall be held in 1998 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Russell G. Walker, Jr., and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 2000 and qualifies. The succeeding term shall begin January 1, 2001. The superior court judgeship held on June 12, 1996, in Superior Court District 20A by a resident of Moore County (James M. Webb) is allocated to Superior Court District 19B2. The term of that judge expires December 31, 2000. The judge’s successor shall be elected in the 2000 general election.

In the nineteenth-C superior court district, Thomas W. Seay, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twentieth-A superior court district, F. Fetzer Mills serves a term expiring December 31, 1992.

In the twentieth-B superior court district, William H. Helms serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-first-A superior court district, William Z. Wood serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-first-B superior court district, Judson D. DeRamus, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1988.

In the twenty-first-C superior court district, William H. Freeman serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-first-D superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the twenty-second superior court district, no election shall be held in 1992 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Preston Cornelius, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term shall begin January 1, 1995. In the twenty-second superior court district, Robert A. Collier serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the twenty-third superior court district, Julius A. Rousseau, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-fourth superior court district, Charles C. Lamm, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the twenty-fifth-A superior court district, Claude S. Sitton serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the twenty-fifth-B superior court district, Forrest A. Ferrell serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-sixth-A superior court district, no election shall be held in 1994 for the full term of the seat now occupied by W. Terry Sherrill, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1996 and qualifies. The succeeding term shall begin January 1, 1997. In the twenty-sixth-A superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the twenty-sixth-B superior court district, Frank W. Snepp, Jr., and Kenneth A. Griffin serve terms expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-sixth-C superior court district, no election shall be held in 1992 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Chase Boone Saunders, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term shall begin January 1, 1995. In the twenty-sixth-C superior court district, Robert M. Burroughs serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the twenty-seventh-A superior court district, no election shall be held in 1988 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Robert E. Gaines, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1990 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins January 1, 1991. In the twenty-seventh-A superior court district, Robert W. Kirby serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-seventh-B superior court district, John M. Gardner serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the twenty-eighth superior court district, Robert D. Lewis and C. Walter Allen serve terms expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twenty-ninth superior court district, Hollis M. Owens, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the thirtieth-A superior court district, James U. Downs serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the thirtieth-B superior court district, Janet M. Hyatt serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

Superior Judicial Court No. of Resident Division District Counties Judges First 1 Camden, Chowan, 2 Currituck, Dare, Gates, Pasquotank, Perquimans First 2 Beaufort, Hyde, 1 Martin, Tyrrell, Washington First 3A Pitt 2 Second 3B Carteret, Craven, 3 Pamlico Second 4 Duplin, Jones, 2 Onslow, Sampson Second 5A (part of New Hanover, 1 Pender see subsection (b)) 5B (part of New Hanover, 1 see subsection (b)) 5C (part of New Hanover, 1 see subsection (b)) First 6A Halifax 1 First 6B Bertie, Hertford, 1 Northampton First 7A Nash 1 First 7B (part of Wilson, 1 part of Edgecombe, see subsection (b)) First 7C (part of Wilson, 1 part of Edgecombe, see subsection (b)) Second 8A Lenoir and Greene 1 Second 8B Wayne 1 First 9 Franklin, Granville, 2 Person, Vance, Warren Third 10A (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 10B (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 10C (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 10D (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 10E (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 10F (part of Wake, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 11A Harnett, 1 Lee Third 11B Johnston 2 Third 12A (part of Cumberland, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 12B (part of Cumberland, 1 see subsection (b)) Third 12C (part of Cumberland, 2 see subsection (b)) Second 13A Bladen, Columbus 1 Second 13B Brunswick 1 First 14A (part of Durham, 1 see subsection (b)) First 14B (part of Durham, 3 see subsection (b)) Third 15A Alamance 2 Fourth 15B Orange, Chatham 2 Third 16A Anson, Richmond, 2 Scotland Second 16B Robeson 2 Fourth 17A Caswell, Rockingham 2 Fourth 17B Stokes, Surry 1 Fourth 18A (part of Guilford, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 18B (part of Guilford, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 18C (part of Guilford, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 18D (part of Guilford, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 18E (part of Guilford, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 19A Cabarrus 1 Third 19B Randolph 2 Fourth 19C Rowan 1 Third 19D Hoke, Moore 2 Third 20A Montgomery, Stanly 2 Third 20B Union 2 Fourth 21A (part of Forsyth, see subsection (b)) 2 Fourth 21B (part of Forsyth, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 21C (part of Forsyth, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 21D (part of Forsyth, 1 see subsection (b)) Fourth 22A Alexander, Iredell 2 Fourth 22B Davidson, Davie 2 Fourth 23 Alleghany, Ashe, 1 Wilkes, Yadkin Fifth 24 Avery, Madison, 2 Mitchell, Watauga, Yancey Fifth 25A Burke, Caldwell 2 Fifth 25B Catawba 2 Fifth 26A (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) Fifth 26B (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) Fifth 26C (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) 26D (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) 26E (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) 26F (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) 26G (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) 26H (part of Mecklenburg, 1 see subsection (b)) Fifth 27A Gaston 2 Fifth 27B Cleveland, Lincoln 2 Fifth 28 Buncombe 2 Fifth 29A McDowell, 1 Rutherford Fifth 29B Henderson, Polk, 1 Transylvania Fifth 30A Cherokee, Clay, 1 Graham, Macon, Swain Fifth 30B Haywood, Jackson 1.

History.

1969, c. 1171, ss. 1-3; c. 1190, s. 4; 1971, c. 377, s. 5; c. 997; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 646; c. 855, s. 1; 1975, c. 529; c. 956, ss. 1, 2; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 114; 1977, c. 1119, ss. 1, 3, 4; c. 1130, ss. 1, 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1238, s. 1; c. 1243, s. 4; 1979, c. 838, s. 119; c. 1072, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1221, s. 1; 1981, c. 964, ss. 1, 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 71.2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1109, ss. 4, 4.1; 1985, c. 698, s. 11(a); 1987, c. 509, s. 1; c. 549, s. 6.6; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 1; c. 1056, ss. 14, 15; 1989, c. 795, s. 22(a); 1991, c. 746, s. 1; 1993, c. 321, ss. 200.4(a), 200.5(a), (d); 1995, c. 51, s. 1; c. 509, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 1(a), (c); 1998-212, s. 16.16A(a); 1998-217, s. 67.3(c); 1999-237, ss. 17.12(b), 17.19(a)-(d), 17.20(a)-(c); 1999-396, s. 1; 2000-67, s. 15.6(a); 2000-140, s. 36; 2001-333, ss. 1, 2; 2001-424, s. 22.4(b); 2001-507, ss. 3, 4; 2003-284, ss. 13.14(a), 13.14(b); 2004-124, s. 14.6(b); 2004-127, s. 2(a); 2005-276, ss. 14.2(a), 14.2(e1); 2006-96, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 14.25(a); 2011-203, ss. 1-3; 2011-417, s. 1; 2012-182, s. 2(a), (b); 2013-360, s. 18B.22(a); 2017-57, s. 18B.9(a); 2018-5, s. 18B.5(a); 2018-14, s. 1(a); 2018-121, ss. 1(a), 10; 2021-180, s. 16.7A(a); 2021-189, s. 5.6(a).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until
January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 7A-41

.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Preclearance Under § 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Information on receipt of preclearance was published in the Register. Please refer to the
North Carolina Register
(website at
http://www.oah.state.nc.us/rules/register) or the Administrative Office of the Courts (website at
http://www.nccourts.org) as described in Chapter 120, Article 6A,
G.S. 120-30.9A et seq.

Session Laws
1993, c. 321, s. 200.4, which amended subsection (a), was effective November 1, 1993, or 15 days after the date upon which s. 200.4(a) and (b) were approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever was later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated February 14, 1994.

Session Laws
1993, c. 321, s. 200.5(a), which amended this section, was effective November 1, 1993, or the date upon which s. 200.5(a) and (b) were approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever was later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated February 14, 1994.

Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 5 provides that c. 589, s. 1, which amended this section, becomes effective January 4, 1997, or the date upon which that section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated December 16, 1996.

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 15.6(c), provides that subsection (a) of the section becomes effective December 15, 2000, as to any district in which no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (Act) and, as to any district in which any county is subject to section 5 of the Act, subsection (a) becomes effective December 15, 2000, or 15 days after the date upon which that subsection is approved under section 5 of the Act, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated October 26, 2000.

Session Laws
2001-333, s. 3, provides: “As to a district in a county not subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, this act is effective when it becomes law. As to a district in a county subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, this act becomes effective when the district is precleared pursuant to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended.” Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated December 20, 2001.

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 22.4(d), provides that the amendment to this section by s. 22.4(b) is effective October 1, 2001, except that the elimination of the vacant judgeship in Superior Court District 4B becomes effective the later of October 1, 2001, or the date upon which it is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965.

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 14.6(d) provides: “As to District 15B, subsection (b) of this section becomes effective December 1, 2004. As to District 3B, subsection (b) of this section becomes effective December 1, 2004, or 15 days after the date upon which that subsection is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.” As of October 19, 2004, preclearance under the Voting Rights Act was still pending.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 14.2(a), which amended subsection (a), was effective December 1, 2005, or the date upon which subsection (a) is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated January 5, 2006.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 14.2(e1), which also amended subsection (a), is effective January 1, 2011, or the date on which subsection (a) is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated January 5, 2006.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 14.2(q), provides in part: “With respect to the realignment of Superior Court Districts 20A and 20B, subsections (a) through (e) of this section become effective December 1, 2005, or the date upon which subsection (a) of this section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. With respect to the addition of a judge in Superior Court District 20B, subsections (e1) and (e2) of this section become effective January 1, 2011, or the date upon which subsection (e1) of this section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. With respect to the division of Superior Court District 29, subsections (a) through (e) of this section become effective December 1, 2005.”

Session Laws
2006-96, s. 5, provides, in part: “Sections 2, 3, and 4 of the act become effective October 1, 2006, or the date upon which Section 2 of this act is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.” Preclearance was received by letter dated December 21, 2006.

Session Laws
2006-96, s. 3, provides: “The superior court judgeship established for District 13A by Section 2 of this act shall be filled by the judge currently serving District 13 who resides in Bladen or Columbus County, who shall serve until the expiration of that judge’s current term.”

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 14.25(b)-(d), provides: “(b) The two superior court judgeships established for District 22A by subsection (a) of this section shall be filled by the two judges currently serving District 22 who reside in Alexander and Iredell Counties. The term of one of those judges expires December 31, 2008, and a successor shall be elected in the 2008 election. The term of the other judges expires December 31, 2010, and a successor shall be elected in the 2010 election.

“(c) One of the superior court judgeships established for District 22B by subsection (a) of this section shall be filled by the judge currently serving District 22 who resides in Davidson County. That judge’s term expires December 31, 2014, and a successor shall be elected in the 2014 election.

“(d) The additional judgeship established for District 22B by subsection (a) of this section shall be filled by election in the 2008 election for an eight-year term expiring December 31, 2016. That judge’s successor shall be elected in the 2016 election.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 18B.22(c), provides: “The two superior court judgeships established for Superior Court District 16A by subsection (a) of this section shall be filled by the superior court judge currently serving Superior Court District 16A who resides in Scotland County and by the superior court judge currently serving Superior Court District 20A who resides in Richmond County. The terms of those judges expire December 31, 2016, and successors shall be elected in the 2016 general election for eight-year terms commencing January 1, 2017.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 18B.22(e), provides: “The superior court judgeship established for Superior Court District 20A by subsection (a) of this section shall be filled by the superior court judge currently serving Superior Court District 20A who resides in Stanly County. The term of that judge expires December 31, 2016, and a successor shall be elected in the 2016 general election for an eight-year term commencing January 1, 2017.”

Session Laws
2017-214, s. 4(a), eliminated party primary elections for candidates for Justice of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals, superior court judges, and district court judges, for the November 6, 2018, general election, and s. 4(b)-(k) of that act provides for notices of candidacy, requirements, a timeline, filing fees, and method of determining the winner of each race. For full text of Session Laws
2017-214, s. 4(a)-(k), see note at
G.S. 163A-970.

Session Laws
2018-3, s. 2(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws
2018-130, ss. 2, 3, provides: “The General Assembly finds that both chambers of the General Assembly have carefully examined judicial redistricting and the forms of judicial selection with multiple committees considering various proposals of selection and new judicial district maps. The General Assembly finds that, to allow for more time to thoughtfully consider these changes, the General Assembly enacted S.L. 2017-214, the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, which, among other items, provided for a one-time cancellation of partisan primaries for the offices of district court judge, superior court judge, judges of the Court of Appeals, and Supreme Court justices for the 2018 election cycle. The General Assembly finds that all elections for judges in 2018 were to be treated uniformly under S.L. 2017-214, the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, while those changes were considered.

“The General Assembly notes that election to these offices will be held under a plurality election system, with candidates running under a political party label on the ballot, without having gone through a party primary. The General Assembly finds that ballot language above the sections of election ballots regarding these impacted offices setting forth that the listed party affiliation is only the self-identified party of a candidate at the time of filing will aid voters’ understanding of the 2018 judicial races.

“(b) For the 2018 general election, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall, notwithstanding
G.S. 163A-1114(b)(2), list the following judicial offices at the end of all partisan offices listed on the general election ballot:

“(1) Justices of the Supreme Court.

“(2) Judges of the Court of Appeals.

“(3) Judges of the superior courts.

“(4) Judges of the district courts.

“(c) Notwithstanding
G.S. 163A-1112, immediately prior to the placement of the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section on the ballot, the following information shall be printed:

“No primaries for judicial office were held in 2018. The information listed by each of the following candidates’ names indicates only the candidates’ party affiliation or unaffiliated status on their voter registration at the time they filed to run for office.

“(d) Except as provided in this section, ballot order for the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section shall be as provided in Section 4(j) of S.L. 2017-214.”

Sessions Laws
2018-121, s. 6, provides: “Other than the filing period, the election for the office of judge for Superior Court District 19D and District Court District 20A shall be held in accordance with Section 4 of S.L. 2017-214, as amended. Candidates seeking the office of judge for Superior Court District 19D or District Court District 20A shall file their notice of candidacy with the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement no earlier than 12:00 noon on July 9, 2018, and no later than 12:00 noon on July 13, 2018.”